Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB36.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2-1907c is hereby amended to read as follows:
2-1907c. On or before September November 1 of each calendar year,
each conservation district shall submit to the division a certification of
the amount of money to be furnished by the county commissioners for
conservation district activities for the ensuing calendar year. Such
amount shall be the same as authorized for such purposes in each
approved county budget. For the purpose of providing state financial
assistance to conservation districts and subject to the matching
requirements as provided further, the division in the regular budget
request, as a line item for the forthcoming fiscal year, shall submit a
special request for an amount equal to not less than the sum of the
allocations of each county to each conservation district, but in no event
to exceed the sum of $25,000 $50,000 per district. This $25,000 Such
$50,000 limitation shall be applicable for fiscal year 2008 2026, and
thereafter, subject to appropriations therefor. The division, as soon as
practicable after July 1 of the following year, shall disburse such
moneys as may be appropriated by the state for this purpose to each
conservation district on a $2 division moneys basis to a $1 county
moneys basis to match the funds allocated by the commissioners of
each county, except that the total amount disbursed shall not exceed
$50,000 per district. Distribution shall be prorated in proportion to
county allocations in the event that appropriations are insufficient for
complete matching of funds. Municipal accounting procedures shall be
used in the distribution of and in the expenditure of all funds.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2-1907c is hereby repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 36—page 2
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.